Utah statutes.
61-2f-302.   Affiliation with a principal broker.
(1)  An individual who is not a principal broker may not engage in an act
described in Section 61-2f-201 unless the individual is affiliated with a
principal broker as:
(a)  an associate broker; or
(b)  a sales agent.
(2) (a)  An inactive associate broker or sales agent may not conduct a real
estate transaction until the inactive associate broker or sales agent becomes
affiliated with a principal broker and submits the required documentation to
the division.
(b)  An inactive principal broker may not conduct a real estate transaction
until the principal broker’s license is activated with the division.
(3)  A sales agent or associate broker may not affiliate with more than one
principal broker at the same time.
(4)  An individual may not be a principal broker of an entity and a sales
agent or associate broker for a different entity at the same time.
(5)  An owner, purchaser, lessor, or lessee who engages the services of a
principal broker may designate which sales agents or associate brokers
affiliated with that principal broker will also represent that owner,
purchaser, lessor, or lessee in the purchase, sale, lease, or exchange of real
estate, or in exercising an option relating to real estate.
